New York, session 2025-2026, A1547.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 394-cccc to read as follows: 3 § 394-cccc. Search engine consumer notices for limited services preg- 4 nancy centers. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms 5 shall have the following meanings: 6 (a) "Limited services pregnancy center" shall mean a facility or enti- 7 ty, including a mobile facility, the primary purpose of which is to 8 provide services to clients who are or may be pregnant, that does not 9 provide or refer for the full range of comprehensive reproductive and 10 sexual health care services reimbursed under the state's Medicaid 11 program. "Limited services pregnancy center" shall not include health 12 care facilities licensed by the state of New York under article twenty- 13 eight of the public health law or articles thirty-one and thirty-two of 14 the mental hygiene law, nor entities whose primary function is to facil- 15 itate adoption. 16 (b) "Search engine" shall mean a program that searches for and identi- 17 fies items in a database that correspond to keywords or characters spec- 18 ified by the user, used especially for finding particular sites or 19 services on the internet and shall include, but not be limited to, 20 Google, Yahoo and Bing. 21 (c) "Social media network" shall mean an internet platform which is 22 designed to enable users to share any content with other users or to 23 make such content available to the public and shall include, but not be EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04754-01-5 A. 1547 2 1 limited to, Facebook, YouTube, Twitter, Instagram, Snapchat, Tumblr and 2 Flickr. 3 2. (a) Every search engine, when responding to a search and providing 4 information for listings of abortion or pregnancy care, shall be 5 required to identify and provide a notice to a user or consumer in a 6 clear and conspicuous manner that certain facilities listed are limited 7 services pregnancy centers, otherwise known as crisis pregnancy centers, 8 and do not have licensed medical professionals onsite. 9 (b) Every social media network shall be required to include a notice 10 with any post by a limited services pregnancy center in a clear and 11 conspicuous manner to all users that such facility is a limited services 12 pregnancy center, otherwise known as a crisis pregnancy center, and does 13 not have licensed medical professionals onsite. 14 3. Such notice shall be required to be added to all limited services 15 pregnancy center listings as well as to advertisements purchased by such 16 centers that appear in search engine results and on social media 17 networks. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.